Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2117
Mental health program, defined.

Mental health program means an approved educational program in a field such as, but not limited to, social work, professional counseling, marriage and family therapy, human development, psychology, family relations, or art therapy, the content of which contains an emphasis on therapeutic mental health and course work in psychotherapy and the assessment of mental disorders.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,309;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 735;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 35;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 10.